Federal Communications Commission Washington, D.C. 20554
Approved by OMB 3060-0032
INSTRUCTIONS FOR FCC 315 APPLICATION FOR CONSENT TO TRANSFER CONTROL OF ENTITY HOLDING BROADCAST STATION CONSTRUCTION PERMIT OR LICENSE GENERAL INSTRUCTIONS A.
This FCC Form is to be used to apply for consent to transfer control of an entity holding a broadcast station construction permit or license.
It consists of the following sections: General Information (licensee, permittee, and contact representatives, if any) II.
Transferor(s) III. Licensee/Permittee IV.
Transferee(s) The Licensee/Permittee must complete Sections I and III.
The Transferor(s) must complete Section II.
The Transferee(s) must complete Section IV.
B.
This application form makes many references to FCC rules.
Applicants should have on hand and be familiar with current broadcast rules in Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations (C.F.R.): (1) (2) (3) (4) Part Part Part Part 0 1 73 74 "Commission Organization" "Practice and Procedure" "Radio Broadcast Services" "Experimental, Auxiliary, and Special Broadcast and Other Program Services" FCC Rules may be purchased from the Government Printing Office.
Current prices may be obtained from the GPO Customer Service Desk at (202) 512-1803.
For payment by credit card, call (202) 512-1800, M-F, 8 a.m. to 4 p.m. e.s.t; facsimile orders may be placed by dialing (202) 518-2233, 24 hours a day.
Payment by check may be made to the Superintendent of Documents, Attn: New Orders, P.O. Box 371954, Pittsburgh, PA 15250-7954.
C. Electronic Filing of Application Forms.
The Commission is currently developing electronic versions I. of various broadcast station application and reporting forms, such as this application form.
As each application form and report goes online, the Commission will by Public Notice announce its availability and the procedures to be followed for accessing and filing the application form or report electronically via the Internet.
For a six-month period following the issuance of the Public Notice, the subject application form or report can be filed with the Commission either electronically or in a paper format.
Electronic filing will become mandatory, on a form-by-form basis, six months after each application form or report becomes available for filing electronically.
D. Applicants that prepare this application in paper form should file an original and two copies of this application and all exhibits.
Applicants should follow the procedures set forth in Part 0 and Part 73 of the Commission's rules.
Amendments to previously filed applications must be prepared, signed and filed in the same manner as the original application.
E.
Public Notice Requirements: (1) 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.3580 requires that applicants for consent to transfer control of an entity holding a construction permit or license for an AM, FM, or TV broadcast station give local notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the community to which the station is licensed.
Local notice is also required to be broadcast over the station, if operating.
However, if the station is the only operating station in its broadcast service licensed to the community involved, publication of the notice in a newspaper is not required.
(Noncommercial educational FM and TV stations are classified as a "different service" from commercial FM and TV stations for purposes of this policy.)
The publication requirement also applies with respect to major amendments to applications as defined in 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.3578(b).
(2) Completion of publication may occur within 30 days before or after the tender of the application to the
Distributional
All previous editions obsolete.
FCC 315 Instructions June 2002
Commission.
Compliance or intent to comply with the public notice requirements must be certified by the Licensee/Permittee in Item 7 of Section III of this application.
The required content of the local notice is described in Paragraph (f) of 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.3580.
Worksheet #1 attached to these instructions provides additional guidance.
Proof of publication need not be filed with this application.
(3) With respect to transfers of control that involve FM and TV booster authorizations, local notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the community or area to be served is also required.
Compliance or intent to comply with the public notice requirements must be certified by the Licensee/Permittee in Item 7 of Section III of this application.
The required content of the local notice is described in Paragraph (g) of 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.3580.
Worksheet #1 attached to these instructions provides additional guidance.
Proof of publication need not be filed with this application.
F. Names/Addresses: In Section I, II, and IV, applicants should use only those state abbreviations approved by the U.S. Postal Service.
The name of the Licensee/Permittee must be stated in Section I, Item 1, exactly as it appears on the authorization to be transferred FCC Registration Number (FRN).
To comply with the Debt Collection Improvement Act of 1996, the applicant must enter its FRN number, a ten-digit unique entity identifier for anyone doing business with the Commission.
The FRN can be obtained through the FCC webpage at http://www.fcc.gov or by manually submitting FCC Form 160.
FCC Form 160 is available for downloading from http://www.fcc.gov/formpage. html or by calling 1-800-418-3676.
Questions concerning the FCC Registration Number can be directed to the Commission's Registration System help desk at http://www.CORES@fcc.gov or by calling 1-877480-3201.
Facility ID Number.
Radio and TV Facility ID Numbers can be obtained at the FCC's Internet Website at www.fcc.gov/mmb.
Once at this website, scroll down and select CDBS Public Access.
You can also obtain your facility ID number by calling: Radio - 202-4182700, TV - 202-418-1600.
Further, the Facility ID Number is now included on all Radio and TV authorizations and postcards.
If the licensee/permittee, transferor, or transferee are represented by a third party (for example, legal counsel) for purposes of prosecuting the FCC Form 315, that person's name, firm or company, mailing address and
telephone/electronic mail address may be specified in Section I, Item 2 (for Licensee/Permittee), Section II, Item 3 (for Transferor), and Section IV, Item 3 (for Transferee).
G.
A copy of the completed application and all related documents shall be made available for inspection by the public in the Licensee/Permittee's public inspection file pursuant to 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.3526 for commercial stations and Section 73.3527 for noncommercial educational stations.
H .
Applicants should provide all information called for by this application.
If any portions of the application are not applicable, the applicant should so state.
Defective or incomplete applications will be returned without consideration.
Inadvertently accepted applications are also subject to dismissal.
See 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.3564(b) I.
In accordance with 47 C.F.R.
Section 1.65, applicants have a continuing obligation to advise the Commission, through amendments, of any substantial and significant changes in the information furnished in this application.
This requirement continues until the FCC action on this application is no longer subject to reconsideration by the Commission or review by any court.
This application requires applicants to certify compliance with many statutory and regulatory requirements.
Detailed instructions and worksheets provide additional information regarding Commission rules and policies.
These materials are designed to track the standards and criteria which the Commission applies to determine compliance and to increase the reliability of applicant certifications.
They are not intended to be a substitute for familiarity with the Communications Act and the Commission's regulations, policies, and precedent.
While applicants are required to review all application instructions and worksheets, they are not required to complete or retain any documentation created or collected to complete the application.
See Sections II-IV, Item 1.
J.
K.
This application is presented primarily in a "Yes/No" certification format.
However, it contains places for submitting explanations and exhibits where necessary or appropriate.
Each certification constitutes a material representation.
Applicants may only mark the "Yes" certification when they are certain that the response is correct.
A "No" response is required if the applicant is requesting a waiver of a pertinent rule and/or policy, or where the applicant is uncertain that the application fully satisfies the pertinent rule and/or policy.
Thus, a "No" response to any of the certification items will not cause the immediate dismissal of the application provided that
2
an appropriate exhibit is submitted.
L.
A representative from the Licensee/Permittee, the Transferor, and the Transferee must sign the application.
Depending on the nature of the applicant, the application should be signed as follows: if a sole proprietorship, personally; if a partnership, by a general partner; if a corporation, by an officer; if an unincorporated association, by a member who is an officer; if a governmental entity, by such duly elected or appointed official as is competent under the laws of the particular jurisdiction.
Counsel may sign the application for his or her client, but only in cases of the applicant's disability or absence from the United States.
When an application is filed electronically, the signature will consist of the electronic equivalent of the typed name of the individual.
See Report and Order in MM Docket No. 98-43, 13 FCC Rcd 23056, 23064 (1998).
INSTRUCTIONS INFORMATION FOR SECTION I--GENERAL
listing of the fees for the transfer of the various types of broadcast station construction permits and licenses and the addresses to which FCC Form 315 should be mailed or otherwise delivered are also set forth in the "Mass Media Services Fee Filing Guide."
This document can be obtained either by writing to the Commission's Form Distribution Center, 9300 E. Hampton Drive, Capital Heights, Maryland 20743, or by calling 1-800-418FORM.
See also 47 C.F.R.
Section 1.1104.
The Fee Filing Guide also contains a list of the Fee Type Codes needed to complete this application.
A separate fee payment must be submitted for each FCC Form 315 filed.
Where control of multiple stations is being transferred on one FCC 315, a single payment covering the total required fee, calculated according to the number of AM, FM, or TV station permits or licenses covered by that FCC Form 315, must be made.
Payment of any required fee must be made by check, bank draft, money order, or credit card.
If payment is by check, bank draft, or money order, the remittance must be denominated in U.S. dollars, drawn upon a U.S. institution, and made payable to the "Federal Communications Commission."
No postdated, altered, or third-party checks will be accepted.
DO NOT SEND CASH.
Additionally, checks dated six months or older will not be accepted.
Applicants who wish to pay for more than one application in the same lockbox with a single payment may also submit a single FCC Form 159.
When paying for multiple filings in the same lockbox with a single payment instrument, applicants must list each filing as a separate item on FCC Form 159 (Remittance Advice).
If additional entries are necessary, applicants should use FCC Form 159C (Continuation Sheet).
Procedures for payment of applications fees when applications are filed electronically will be announced by subsequent Public Notice.
See General Instruction C above.
Payment of application fees may also be made by Electronic Payment prior to the institution of electronic filing procedures, provided that prior approval has been obtained from the Commission.
Licensees/Permittees interested in this option must first contact the Credit and Debt Management Center at (202) 418-1995 to make the necessary arrangements.
Applicants hand-delivering FCC Forms 315 may receive a dated receipt copy by presenting a complete copy of the filing to the acceptance clerk at the time of delivery.
For mailed-in applications, a "return copy" of the application should be furnished and clearly marked as a "return copy."
The applicant should attach this copy to a stamped, self-addressed envelope.
Only one piece of
A. Item 3: Fees.
The Commission is statutorily required to collect charges for certain regulatory services to the public.
Generally, applicants seeking to transfer licenses or permits of AM, FM, or TV broadcast stations are required to submit a fee with the filing of FCC Form 315.
Government entities, however, are exempt from this fee requirement.
Exempt entities include possessions, states, cities, counties, towns, villages, municipal organizations, and political organizations or subparts thereof governed by elected or appointed officials exercising sovereign direction over communities or governmental programs.
Also exempt are full-service noncommercial educational radio and TV broadcast licensees and permittees, provided that the station(s) being transferred will continue to operate noncommercially.
See 47 C.F.R.
Section 1.1114.
When filing a fee-exempt application, an applicant must complete Item 3 and provide an explanation as appropriate.
Applications NOT subject to a fee may be hand-delivered or mailed to the FCC at its Washington, D.C. offices.
See 47 C.F.R.
Section 0.401(a).
Feeexempt applications should not be sent to the Mellon Bank Lockbox; so doing will result in a delay in processing the application.
The Commission's fee collection program utilizes a U.S. Treasury lockbox bank for maximum efficiency of collection and processing.
Prior to the institution of electronic filing procedures, all FCC Form 315 applications requiring the remittance of a fee, or for which a waiver or deferral from the fee requirement is requested, must be submitted to the appropriate post office box address.
See 47 C.F.R.
Section 0.401(b).
A
3
paper per application will be stamped for receipt purposes.
For further information regarding fees and payment procedures, applicants should consult the "Mass Media Services Fee Filing Guide."
B. Item 5: Auction Authorization.
Under the Commission's competitive bidding licensing procedures, applicants seeking to transfer control of a broadcast construction permit or license within three years of receipt of the original permit by means of competitive bidding must inform the Commission that such authorization was obtained through competitive bidding.
See 47 C.F.R.
Section 1.2111(a).
Item 5 requires the applicant to identify those authorizations that were obtained through competitive bidding, and for which transfer of control approval is sought.
The Commission's auction rules also require an applicant seeking approval of a transfer of control of a license or construction permit within three years of receipt of such authorization by means of competitive bidding to file with the Commission the associated contracts for sale, option agreements, management agreements, or other documents disclosing the consideration that the applicant will receive in return for the transfer of its license or permit.
See 47 C.F.R Sections 1.2111(a), 73.5009(a).
If applicable, this information should be submitted as an exhibit to Item 5.
C. Item 6: Noncommercial Educational Holding Period.
Under the Commission's licensing procedures for stations operating on channels reserved for noncommercial educational use, applicants seeking to transfer a noncommercial educational TV, FM, or FM translator station received as a result of evaluation in a point system are subject to certain restrictions if the station has not after the point system operated for four years with a minimum operating schedule.
Item 6(a) requires the applicant to indicate whether any authorizations were obtained through a point system.
Answer "yes" if any of the reserved channel noncommercial educational stations involved in the transaction were authorized pursuant to a point system selection procedure, regardless of whether authorization was to issued to the applicant or to a predecessor.
Applicants operating only on non-reserved "commercial" channels should answer "no."
Applicants operating on reserved channels should answer "no" if all stations were authorized before May 2000 and no major modifications have occurred, or if all stations authorized from May 2000 onward were authorized using a method other than point system [such as award to a single applicant, authorization pursuant to a settlement agreement among
all mutually exclusive parties, or selection of an applicant based on comparison pursuant to 47 U.S.C.
Section 307(b) (fair distribution) only.]
Item 6(b) applies only to applicants who answered "yes" to 6(a).
It asks whether all stations awarded by point system have satisfied the four-year holding period on such stations.
Applicants should answer "yes" to 6(b) if, between the time of point system authorization and the time of the present application, the station has operated pursuant to that authorization for four years (48 months) on-air, pursuant to the Commission's minimum operating schedule.
Applicants with stations not yet meeting the four-year holding period should answer "no" and provide an exhibit identifying the stations that have not met the holding period, and demonstrating that the transaction is consistent with 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.7005(a).
Pursuant to that rule section, the applicant must demonstrate the following: (1) that the proposed transferee would qualify for points equal to or greater than those of the party that prevailed in the point system; and (2) that consideration received and/or promised does not exceed the transferor's legitimate and prudent expenses in applying for and constructing the station.
INSTRUCTIONS FOR SECTION II--TRANSFEROR A. Item 1: Certification.
Each applicant is responsible for the information that the application instructions and worksheets convey.
As a key element in the Commission's streamlined licensing process, a certification that these materials have been reviewed and that each question response is based on the applicant's review is required.
B. Item 2: Applicant Name.
The name of each transferor must be stated in Item 2: if the transferor is a corporation, the exact corporate name; if a partnership, the name under which the partnership does business; if an unincorporated association, the name of an executive officer, his/her office, and the name of the association; and, if an individual transferor, the person's full legal name.
C. Item 4: Ownership Interest to be Transferred. question requires that the applicants specify, for transferor in the subject transaction, the voting equity plus debt percentages held in licensee/permittee by that transferor both before and the consummation of the transaction.
INSTRUCTIONS FOR LICENSEE/PERMITTEE SECTION This each and the after
III--
4
A. Item 1: Certification.
The licensee/permittee must review the instructions for Section II, Item 1, of this form before completing this item.
B. Item 2: Authorizations to be Transferred.
Unless specifically enumerated as excluded authorizations, the authorizations for all subsidiary communications services (SCAs), FM and TV booster stations, and auxiliary service stations authorized under Subparts D, E, F, and H of 47 C.F.R. Part 74 will be included in the assignment of the license of the primary station(s).
Applicants should complete the table.
If preparing this application in paper form, attach a separate page using the table format where additional space is needed.
NOTE: Applications for the transfer of control of a permit or license for a TV or FM translator station or a low power television station, must be filed on FCC Form 345.
The submission of a separate filing fee with the FCC Form 345 may also be required.
C. Item 3: Agreements for Transfer of Control.
Applicants must submit with the application and place in the public inspection file of each subject station a complete and final copy of the unredacted contract for the transfers of control that are the subject of this application, including all exhibits and attachments.
The application and contracts must be retained until final action is taken on this application, with the exception that any application granted pursuant to a waiver of any Commission rule must be retained in the public inspection file for as long as the waiver is in effect.
See 47 C.F.R.
Sections 73.3526(e)(2) (for commercial stations) and 73.3527(e)(2) (for noncommercial educational stations).
Applicants must certify their compliance with these requirements in Items 3a and 3b.
Item 3c asks applicants to certify that the agreements to transfer control of the subject licensee entity "comply fully with the Commission's rules and policies."
In order to complete this certification, applicants must consider a broad range of issues.
Worksheet #2 provides guidance on key compliance issues to facilitate applicants' review of their proposed transactions, and to help applicants identify issues where additional explanatory exhibits may be required or helpful.
If the agreements also include a time brokerage agreement or local marketing agreement pursuant to which the transferee will supply programming to the station prior to FCC approval, then applicants must review Worksheet #3D, which covers issues relating to time brokerage and local marketing agreements involving the transferee.
D. Item 4: Other Authorizations.
Instructions for Section IV, Item 6 of this form define "party to the application" and "attributable interest" as used in this question.
E. Items 5 and 6: Character Issues/Adverse Findings.
These questions require an evaluation of any unresolved character issues involving the licensee/permittee(s) or any of its principals, as well as any relevant adverse findings by a court or administrative body.
Licensee/permittee(s) must review the instructions for Section IV, Items 9 and 10, of this form before completing this item.
F. Item 8: Auction Authorization.
This question asks the licensee/permittee to certify that the proposed transfer will comply with the "unjust enrichment" provisions of the Commission's competitive bidding rules, 47 C.F.R.
Section 1.2111(d)(1).
Licensee/permittee(s) must review the instructions for Section IV, Item 14 before completing this item.
G. Item 9: Anti-Drug Abuse Act Certification.
This question requires the licensee/permittee to certify that neither it nor any party to the application is subject to denial of federal benefits pursuant to the Anti-Drug Abuse Act of 1988, 21 U.S.C.
Section 862.
Licensee/permittee(s) must review the instructions for Section IV, Item 15, of this form before completing this item.
INSTRUCTIONS FOR SECTION IV -- TRANSFEREE A. Item 1: Certification.
The transferee must review the instructions for Section II, Item 1, of this form before completing this item.
B. Item 2: Name of Transferee.
The name of each transferee must be stated exactly in Item 2.
The name of the transferee shall be the exact corporate name, if transferee is a corporation; if a partnership, the name of all general partners and the name under which the partnership does business; if an unincorporated association, the name of an executive officer, his/her office, and the name of the association; and, if the transferees are individual applicants, the full legal name of each person.
C. Item 4: Organization of Transferee.
This question asks the transferee to specify its organizational structure.
If the transferee's structure is not among the business entities enumerated in the form, the applicant must check the box marked "Other" and attach an exhibit describing in detail its organizational structure.
D. Item 5: Agreements for Transfer of Control.
This question requires the transferee to certify that the written agreement submitted to the Commission and contained in the licensee/permittee's public inspection file embodies
5
the complete and final agreement between the parties and that the agreement complies fully with the Commission's rules and policies regarding station sales contracts.
Worksheet #2 provides guidance on key compliance issues to facilitate applicants' review of their proposed transaction, and to help applicants identify issues where additional explanatory exhibits may be required or helpful.
If the sale agreements also include a time brokerage agreement or local marketing agreement, pursuant to which the transferee will supply programming to the station prior to FCC approval, then applicants must review Worksheet #3D.
E. Item 6: Parties to the Application.
This question requires the disclosure of information on the transferee and all parties to the application.
As used in this application form, the term "party to the application" includes any individual or entity whose ownership or positional interest in the applicant is attributable.
An attributable interest is an ownership interest in or relation to an applicant or licensee which will confer on its holder that degree of influence or control over the applicant or licensee sufficient to implicate the Commission's multiple ownership rules.
In responding to Item 6, applicants should review the Commission's multiple ownership attribution policies and standards which are set forth in the Notes to 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.3555, as revised and explained in Review of the Commission's Regulations Governing Attribution of Broadcast and Cable/MDS Interests, FCC 99-207, released August 6, 1999.
See also, Report and Order in MM Docket No. 83-46, 97 FCC 2d 997 (1984), reconsideration granted in part, 58 RR 2d 604 (1985), further modified on reconsideration, 61 RR 2d 739 (1986).
Generally, insulated limited partners or members of a limited liability corporation, certain investors, and certain creditors are not considered parties to the application.
However, as set forth in Worksheet #3E entitled, "Investor Insulation and Non-Party Influence over Transferee," the holder of such an interest may be deemed a party to the application and, if so, must be listed in the table in Item 6a.
In the event that the Investor Insulation and Non-Party Influence over Transferee worksheet requires the submission of an explanatory exhibit, the transferee must respond "No" to Section IV, Item 6b and complete this exhibit.
Certain interests held by substantial investors in, or creditors of, the applicant may also be attributable and the investor reportable as a party to the application, if the interest falls within the Commission's equity/debt plus (EDP) attribution standard.
Under the EDP standard, the interest held, aggregating both equity and debt, must exceed 33% of the total asset value (all equity plus all debt) of the applicant, a broadcast station licensee, cable
television system, daily newspaper or other media outlet subject to the Commission's broadcast multiple ownership rules AND the interest holder must either also hold an attributable interest in a media outlet in the same market or supply over 15% of the total weekly broadcast programming hours of the station in which the interest is held.
For example, the equity interest of an insulated limited partner in a limited partnership applicant would normally not be considered attributable.
However, under the EDP standard, that interest would be attributable if the limited partner's interest exceeded 33% of the applicant's total asset value AND the limited partner also held a 5% voting interest in a radio or television station licensee in the same market.
As used here, the term "transferee" is synonymous with the term "applicant."
Additionally, "parties to the application" includes the following with respect to each of the listed applicant entities: INDIVIDUAL APPLICANT: The natural person seeking to hold in his or her own right the authorization specified in this application.
PARTNERSHIP APPLICANT: Each partner, including all limited partners.
However, a limited partner in a limited partnership is not considered a party to the application IF the limited partner is not materially involved, directly or indirectly, in the management or operation of the media-related activities of the partnership and the applicant so certifies in response to Section IV, Item 6b.
Sufficient insulation of a limited partner for purposes of this certification would be assured if the limited partnership arrangement: (1) specifies that any exempt limited partner (if not a natural person, its directors, officers, partners, etc.) cannot act as an employee of the limited partnership if his or her functions, directly or indirectly, relate to the media enterprises of the company; (2) bars any exempt limited partner from serving, in any material capacity, as an independent contractor or agent with respect to the partnership's media enterprises; (3) restricts any exempted limited partner from communicating with the licensee or the general partner on matters pertaining to the day-to-day operations of its business; (4) empowers the general partner to veto any admissions of additional general partners admitted by vote of the exempt limited partners; (5) prohibits any exempt limited partner from voting on
6
the removal of a general partner or limits this right to situations where the general partner is subject to bankruptcy proceedings, as described in Sections 402 (4)-(5) of the Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act, is adjudicated incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction, or is removed for cause, as determined by an independent party; (6) bars any exempt limited partner from performing any services to the limited partnership materially relating to its media activities, with the exception of making loans to, or acting as a surety for, the business; and (7) states, in express terms, that any exempt limited partner is prohibited from becoming actively involved in the management or operation of the media businesses of the partnership.
Notwithstanding conformance of the partnership agreement to these criteria, however, the requisite certification cannot be made if the applicant has actual knowledge of a material involvement of a limited partner in the management or operation of the media-related businesses of the partnership.
In the event that the applicant cannot certify as to the noninvolvement of a limited partner, the limited partner will be considered as a party to this application.
LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY APPLICANT: The Commission treats a LLC as a limited partnership, each of whose members is considered to be a party to the application.
However, where a LLC member is insulated in the manner specified above with respect to a limited partnership and where the relevant state statute authorizing the LLC permits a LLC member to insulate itself in accordance with the Commission's criteria, that LLC member is not considered a party to the application.
In such a case, the applicant should certify "Yes" in response to Section IV, Item 6b.
CORPORATE APPLICANT: Each officer, director and owner of stock accounting for 5% or more of the issued and outstanding voting stock of the applicant is considered a party to the applicant.
Where the 5% stock owner is itself a corporation, each of its stockholders, directors and "executive" officers (president, vicepresident, secretary, treasurer or their equivalents) is considered a party to this application UNLESS the applicant submits as an exhibit a statement establishing that an individual director or officer will not exercise authority or influence in areas that will affect the applicant or the station.
In this statement, the applicant should identify the individual by name, title, describe the individual's duties and responsibilities, and explain the manner in which such individual is insulated from the
corporate applicant and should not be attributed an interest in the corporate applicant or considered a party to this application.
In addition, a person or entity holding an ownership interest in the corporate stockholder of the applicant is considered a party to this application ONLY IF that interest, when multiplied by the corporate stockholder's interest in the applicant, would account for 5% or more of the issued and outstanding voting stock of the applicant.
For example, where Corporation X owns stock accounting for 25% of the applicant's votes, only Corporation X shareholders holding 20 percent or more of the issued and outstanding voting stock of Corporation X have a 5% or more indirect interest in the applicant (.25 x .20 = .05) and, therefore, are considered parties to this application.
In applying the multiplier, any entity holding more than 50% of its subsidiary will be considered a 100% owner.
Where the 5% stock owner is a partnership, each general partner and any limited partner that is non-insulated, regardless of the partnership interest, is considered a party to the application.
Stock subject to stockholder cooperative voting agreements accounting for 5% or more of the votes in a corporate applicant will be treated as if held by a single entity and any stockholder holding 5% or more of the stock in that block is considered a party to this application.
An investment company, insurance company or trust department of a bank is not considered a party to this application, and an applicant may properly certify that such entity's interest is non-attributable, IF its aggregated holding accounts for less than 20% of the outstanding votes in the applicant AND IF: (1) such entity exercises no influence or control over the corporation, directly or indirectly; and (2) such entity has no representatives among the officers and directors of the corporation.
ANY OTHER APPLICANT: Each executive officer, member of the governing board and owner or holder of 5% or more of the votes in the applicant is considered a party to the applicant.
Radio applicants should be certain to include the proposed ownership structure for the licensee after consummation of the proposed transaction (including officers and directors, if the licensee is a corporation) as well as the ownership structure of the transferee because there will be occasions in which the structure of the licensee and the transferee will not be identical.
This can occur, for example, when not all of the stock of a corporate applicant is transferred to a new owner, or
7
when the transferees are individuals and not business associations such as corporations or partnerships.
For purposes of simplicity and clarity, the licensee structure information may be tendered using the tabular format provided in Item 6.
F. Item 8: Multiple Ownership.
This question requires that the transferee certify compliance with the Commission's broadcast ownership rules, including restrictions on investor insulation and participation of non-party investors and creditors.
In order to facilitate the evaluation of the transaction that is the subject of this FCC Form 315, transferees are directed to Worksheet #3, which is tailored to the individual inquiries in Item 8.
NOTE -- Radio Applicants Only: If any party to the application proposes to hold an attributable interest in more than one AM or FM station where the principal community contours of the two same-service stations would overlap, the applicant is directed to Worksheet 3, Section A.I., Question 1.
If the answer to Question 1 is "No," an applicant is required to submit to the Commission with this application and place in the public inspection file of each subject station an explanatory exhibit which must include: (1) a map that clearly identifies, by relevant contours, the location and geographic coverage of the radio market or markets involved; (2) the number of commercial AM and FM stations counted as being in the market or markets, including a map that shows the principal community contours of the stations that define the market or markets and the principal community contours of all commercial stations intersecting with the principal community contours of these stations; and (3) the call letters and locations of all stations in the market or markets that are, or are proposed to be, commonly owned, operated, or controlled, including any AM or FM station in the market for which the applicant or any party to the application brokers more than 15 percent of that station's broadcast time per week.
However, in situations where the same service overlap only involves stations licensed to the same community, the applicant need not include a contour overlap map, provided the information called for by items (2) and (3) above is set forth in the required explanatory exhibit.
G. Items 9 and 10: Character Issues/Adverse Findings.
Item 9 requires the transferee to certify that neither it nor any party to the application has had any interest in or connection with an application that was or is the subject of unresolved character issues.
A transferee must disclose in response to Item 10 whether it or any party to the application has been the subject of a final adverse finding with respect to certain relevant non-broadcast matters.
The Commission's character policies and litigation reporting requirements for broadcast applicants
focus on misconduct which violates the Communications Act or a Commission rule or policy, and on certain specified non-FCC misconduct.
In responding to Items 9 and 10, applicants should review the Commission's character qualification policies, which are fully set forth in Character Qualifications, 102 FCC 2d 1179 (1985), reconsideration denied, 1 FCC Rcd 421 (1986), as modified, 5 FCC Rcd 3252 (1990) and 7 FCC Rcd 6564 (1992).
Where the response to Item 9 is "No," the transferee must submit an exhibit that includes an identification of the party having had the interest, the call letters and location of the station or file number of the application or docket, and a description of the nature of the interest or connection, including relevant dates.
The transferee should also fully explain why the unresolved character issue is not an impediment to a grant of this application.
In responding to Item 10, the transferee should consider any relevant adverse finding that occurred within the past ten years.
Where that adverse finding was fully disclosed to the Commission in an application filed on behalf of this station or in another broadcast station application and the Commission, by specific ruling or by subsequent grant of the application, found the adverse finding not to be disqualifying, it need not be reported again and the transferee may respond "Yes" to this item.
However, an adverse finding that has not been reported to the Commission and considered in connection with a prior application would require a "No" response.
Where the response to Item 10 is "No," the transferee must provide in an exhibit a full disclosure of the persons and matters involved, including an identification of the court or administrative body and the proceeding (by dates and file numbers), and the disposition of the litigation.
Where the requisite information has been earlier disclosed in connection with another pending application, or as required by 47 C.F.R.
Section 1.65(c), the applicant need only provide an identification of that previous submission by reference to the file number in the case of an application, the call letters of the station regarding which the application or Section 1.65 information was filed, and the date of filing.
The transferee should also fully explain why the adverse finding is not an impediment to a grant of this application.
H. Item 11: Alien Ownership and Control.
All applications must comply with Section 310 of the Communications Act, as amended.
Specifically, Section 310 proscribes issuance of a construction permit or station license to an alien, the representative of an alien, a foreign government or a representative thereof, or a corporation organized under the laws of a foreign
8
government.
This proscription also applies with respect to any entity of which more than 20% of the capital stock is owned or voted by aliens, their representatives, a foreign government or its representative, or an entity organized under the laws of a foreign country.
The Commission may also deny a construction permit or station license to a licensee directly or indirectly controlled by another entity of which more than 25% of the capital stock is owned or voted by aliens, their representatives, a foreign government or its representative, or another entity organized under the laws of a foreign country.
Compliance with Section 310 is determined by means of a two-prong analysis, one pertaining to voting interests and the second to ownership interests.
See, e.g., BBC License Subsidiary L.P., 10 FCC Rcd 10968 (1995).
The voting interests held by aliens in a licensee through intervening domestically organized entities are determined in accordance with the multiplier guidelines for calculating indirect ownership interests in an applicant as set forth in the "Corporate Applicant" Instructions for Section IV, Item 6a.
For example, if an alien held a 30-percent voting interest in Corporation A which, in turn, held a non-controlling 40-percent voting interest in Licensee Corporation B, the alien interest in Licensee Corporation B would be calculated by multiplying the alien's interest in Corporation A by that entity's voting interest in Licensee Corporation B.
The resulting voting interest (30% x 40% = 12%) would not exceed the 25% statutory benchmark.
However, if Corporation A held a controlling 60% voting interest in Corporation B, the multiplier would not be utilized and the full 30 percent alien voting interest in Corporation A would be treated as a 30 percent interest in Licensee Corporation B, i.e., an impermissible 30% alien indirect voting interest in the licensee.
If Partnership A held a 40% voting interest in Licensee Corporation B, that voting interest would be similarly impermissible if any general partner or any non-insulated limited partner of Partnership A was an alien, regardless of his or her partnership interest.
Transferees must also comply with the separate alien equity ownership benchmark restrictions of Section 310.
Under the second prong of the analysis, a transferee must determine the pro rata equity holdings of any alien investor in a licensee entity or its parent.
In calculating alien ownership, the same voting interest multiplier rules apply.
In order to complete this two-prong analysis, a transferee must determine the citizenship of each entity holding either a voting or equity interest or else explain how it determined the relevant percentages.
Corporate applicants and licensees whose stock is publicly traded have employed a variety of practices, including sample
surveys using a recognized statistical methodology, the use of a separate restrictive class of stock for alien owners, and the compiling of citizenship information on each stockholder by the corporation's stock transfer agent, to ensure the accuracy and completeness of their citizenship disclosures and their continuing compliance with Section 310.
I. Item 12: Financial Qualifications.
A transferee must certify that it is financially qualified to effectuate its proposal, with sufficient net liquid assets on hand or available from committed sources of funds to consummate the transaction and operate the facilities for three months without additional revenue.
This certification includes all contractual requirements, if any, as to collateral, guarantees, and capital investments.
See Financial Qualifications Standard, 87 FCC 2d 200 (1981).
Documentation supporting this certification need not be submitted with this application, but must be made available to the Commission upon request.
Financial statements relied on to make this certification should be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
J. Item 13: Programming.
Transferees need no longer file a specific program service proposal.
Nevertheless, prior to making this certification, the transferee should familiarize itself with its obligation to provide programming responsive to the needs and interests of the residents of its community of license.
See Programming Information in Broadcast Applications, 3 FCC Rcd 5467 (1988).
K. Item 14: Auction Authorization.
The competitive bidding rules adopted by the Commission include certain provisions to prevent "unjust enrichment" by entities that acquire broadcast authorizations through the use of bidding credits or other special measures.
Specifically, the holder of a broadcast license or construction permit, who successfully utilized a bidding credit to obtain the authorization, is required to reimburse the government for the total amount of the bidding credit, plus interest based on the rate for ten-year U.S. Treasury obligations applicable on the date the construction permit was granted, as a condition for Commission approval of any assignment or transfer of that license or construction permit, if the authorization will be acquired by an entity that does not meet the eligibility criteria for the bidding credit.
See 47 C.F.R.
Sections 1.2111(d)(1), 73.5007.
The amount of this payment will be reduced over a fiveyear period.
See 47 C.F.R.
Sections 1.2111(d)(2), 73.5007.
No payment is required if (1) the authorization is transferred or assigned more than five years after the initial issuance of the construction permit; or (2) the
9
proposed transferee or assignee meets the eligibility criteria for the bidding credit.
In accordance with these provisions, Item 14 requires that the transferee certify that either (1) more than five years have passed since the transferor received its authorization(s) via the competitive bidding process; or (2) the proposed transferee meets the eligibility criteria for the bidding credit.
If such certification cannot be made, then the transferee must answer "No" in Item 14 and tender the applicable reimbursement payment to the United States Government.
See 47 C.F.R Sections 1.2111(d), 73.5007, 73.5008.
L. Item 15: Anti-Drug Abuse Act Certification.
This question requires the transferee to certify that neither it nor any party to the application is subject to denial of federal benefits pursuant to the Anti-Drug Abuse Act of 1988, 21 U.S.C.
Section 862.
Section 5301 of the Anti-Drug Abuse Act of 1988 provides federal and state court judges the discretion to deny federal benefits to individuals convicted of offenses consisting of the distribution or possession of controlled substances.
Federal benefits within the scope of the statute include FCC authorizations.
A "Yes" response to Item 15 constitutes a certification that neither the transferee nor any party to this application has been convicted of such an offense or, if it has, it is not ineligible to receive the authorization sought by this application because of Section 5301.
With respect to this question only, the term "party to the application" includes if the applicant is an individual, that individual; if the applicant is a corporation or unincorporated association, all officers, directors, or persons holding 5 percent or more of the outstanding stock or shares (voting and/or non-voting) of the applicant; all members if a membership organization; and if the applicant is a partnership, all general partners and all limited partners, including both insulated and non-insulated limited partners, holding a 5 percent or more interest in the partnership.
M. Item 14.
Transferee's Equal Employment Opportunity Program.
Applicants seeking authority to acquire control of an entity holding such construction permit or license of a commercial, noncommercial or international broadcast station are required to afford equal employment opportunity to all qualified persons and to refrain from discriminating in employment and related benefits on the basis or race, color, religion, national origin or sex.
See 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.2080.
Pursuant to these requirements, an applicant who proposes to employ five or more full-time employees in its station employment unit must establish a program
designed to assure equal employment opportunity for women and minority groups (that is, Blacks not of Hispanic origin, Asian or Pacific Islanders, American Indians or Alaskan Natives, and Hispanics).
This is submitted to the Commission as the Model EEO Program on FCC Form 396-A, which should be filed as part of the application.
If an applicant proposes to employ less than five full-time employees in its station employment unit, no EEO program for women or minorities need be filed.
General guidelines for developing an Equal Employment Opportunity program are set forth in FCC Form 396-A. NOTE: This Broadcast Equal Employment Opportunity Model Program Report (FCC Form 396-A) is to be utilized only by applicants for new construction permits and by assignees and transferees.
FCC NOTICE TO INDIVIDUALS REQUIRED BY THE PRIVACY ACT AND THE PAPERWORK REDUCTION ACT The FCC is authorized under the Communications Act of 1934, as amended, to collect the personal information we request in this form.
We will use the information provided in the application to determine whether approving this application is in the public interest.
If we believe there may be a violation or potential violation of a FCC statute, regulation, rule or order, your application may be referred to the Federal, state or local agency responsible for investigating, prosecuting, enforcing or implementing the statute, rule, regulation or order.
In certain cases, the information in your application may be disclosed to the Department of Justice or a court or adjudicative body when (a) the FCC; (b) any employee of the FCC; or (c) the United States Government is a party to a proceeding before the body or has an interest in the proceeding.
In addition, all information provided in this form will be available for public inspection.
If you owe a past due debt to the federal government, any information you provide may also be disclosed to the Department of Treasury Financial Management Service, other federal agencies and/or your employer to offset your salary, IRS tax refund or other payments to collect that debt.
The FCC may also provide this information to these agencies through the matching of computer records when authorized.
If you do not provide the information requested on this form, the application may be returned without action having been taken upon it or its processing may be delayed while a request is made to provide the missing information.
Your response is required to obtain the requested authorization.
We have estimated that each response to this collection of information will take 11 hours for single station transactions
10
and 44 hours for multiple station transactions.
Our estimate includes the time to read the instructions, look through existing records, gather and maintain the required data, and actually complete and review the form or response.
If you have any comments on this estimate, or on how we can improve the collection and reduce the burden it causes you, please write the Federal Communications Commission, AMD-PERM, Paperwork Reduction Project (3060-0032), Washington, DC 20554.
We will also accept your comments via the Internet if your send them to jboley@fcc.gov.
Please DO NOT SEND COMPLETED APPLICATIONS TO THIS ADDRESS.
Remember - you are not required to respond to a collection of information sponsored by the Federal government, and the government may not conduct or sponsor this collection, unless it displays a currently valid OMB control number of if we fail to provide you with this notice.
This collection has been assigned an OMB control number of 3060-0032.
THE FOREGOING NOTICE IS REQUIRED BY THE PRIVACY ACT OF 1974, P.L. 93-579, DECEMBER 31, 1974, 5 U.S.C. 552a(e)(3), AND THE PAPERWORK REDUCTION ACT OF 1995, P.L. 104-13, OCTOBER 1, 1995, 44 U.S.C. 3507.
11
WORKSHEET # 1 LOCAL NOTICE CHECKLIST Applicants must certify that they have complied with Section 73.3580 regarding publication of local notice of the subject application.
This worksheet may be used in responding to Section III, Item 7 of Licensee/Permittee section of Form 315.
1.
Newspaper notice (a) Dates of publication: (i) All within 30 days of tender of the application? (b) Daily newspaper published in community? (i) If "Yes," public notice must appear twice a week for two consecutive weeks.
(c) No such daily newspaper, weekly newspaper published in community? (i) If "Yes," notice must appear once a week for three consecutive weeks.
(d) If no such daily or weekly newspaper, local notice must appear in daily newspaper with the greatest circulation in the community twice a week for two consecutive weeks.
2.
Broadcast notice (a) Once daily for 4 days in the second week following the filing of the application? (b) At least 2 announcements during "prime time" (6 p.m. - 11 p.m. for television) or "drive time" (7 a.m. - 9 a.m. and/or 4 p.m. - 6 p.m. for radio), as applicable? 3.
Text: do the announcements contain the following information? (a) Applicant name(s) (b) Names of all officers, directors, 10% shareholders (if corporation), all non-insulated partners (if partnership) (c) Purpose of application (d) Date on which application was filed (e) Call letters and frequency/channel of station (f) Statement that copy of application is available in Public File (g) Location of public file Yes Yes No No Yes Yes No No Yes Yes No No
Yes
No
Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes
No No No No No
FCC 315Worksheet 1 June 2002
WORKSHEET 2 # SALES CONTRACT EVALUATION WORKSHEET This worksheet may be used by the licensee/permittee in responding to Section III, Item 3 of FCC Form 315; it may also be used by the transferee in responding to Section IV, Item 5.
The applicants should review these questions with respect to all contractual documents, agreements, and/or understandings between the transferor and the transferee.
See Worksheet #3E (Time Brokerage/Local Marketing Agreement) if agreements permit transferee to provide programming for the subject station(s) prior to Commission approval of the proposed transfer of control.
1.
Do the written contracts and/or agreements in the licensee/permittee's public inspection file embody the complete and final agreement for the sale of the station(s) which are to be transferred? (a) Arethere unwritten any agreements the between transferor thetransferee have beenreferencedcontract and which not in the documents to besubmittedthe withapplication? If"Yes," terms these the of agreementsbereducedwriting submitted with other must to and along the contract documents.
Yes No
Yes
No
(b) Are anywritten oralagreements thetransferor the there or between and transferee future regarding contractual arrangements outof arising this transaction? If"Yes," terms these the of agreementsbereducedwriting submitted with other must to and along the contract documents.
(c) Have there been any amendments to the contract? If "Yes," the amendment (or its material terms, if the amendment is not in writing) must be submitted as an amendment to the application.
Note: The obligation to submit all amendments to the contract continues until Commission action on the subject application is no longer subject to administrative or judicial review.
2.
Do these documents provide the transferee with ultimate control over and use of all necessary physical property without reservation? Do these documents provide the transferee with ultimate control over station programming without reservation? Note: The response to both Questions 2 and 3 must be "Yes," in order to certify that the contractual documents "comply fully with the Commission's rules and policies."
If "No," the applicant must mark "No" and disclose all details of any restriction on the transferee's complete control of the station in an exhibit to the application.
4.
Is there any provision in the agreements that provides for a reversion of the license(s) in the event of default or any right to reassignment of the license in the future? Note: The response to Question 4 must be "No," in order to certify that the contractual documents "comply fully with the Commission's rules and policies."
If "Yes," the applicant may not make the appropriate certification.
Yes
No
Yes
No
Yes
No
3.
Yes
No
Yes
No
FCC 315 Worksheet 2 June 2002
5.
Is there any provision in the agreements which provides for a security interest in the station license(s), permits or authorizations? Note: In order to certify that the contractual documents "comply fully with the Commission's rules and policies," the response to Question 5 must be "No."
Under existing precedent, it is permissible to grant a security interest in the proceeds of the sale of a station license, permit, or authorization, but not in the license, permit, or authorization itself.
Yes
No
6.
Do the agreements contain a covenant not to compete? (a) If "Yes," does the geographic scope of the covenant extend beyond the service contour of the station(s) to be transferred (Grade B for TV, 1.0 mV/m for AM and FM)?
Yes Yes
No No
(b) If "Yes," does the duration of the covenant extend beyond the length of a full license term? Note: If the response to Question 6 is "Yes," the response to Questions 6(a) and 6(b) must be "No" in order to certify that the contractual documents "comply fully with the Commission's rules and policies."
If not, the applicant may not make the appropriate certification.
7.
Do the agreements contain a stock pledge? (a) If "Yes," do the agreements expressly state that voting rights will remain with the transferee, even in the event of default?
Yes
No
Yes Yes
No No
(b) If "Yes," do the agreements indicate that, in the event of default, there will be either a public (i.e., auction) or private arm's length sale of the pledged interests? (c) If "Yes," do the agreements provide that, prior to the exercise of stockholder rights by the purchaser at such public or private sale, consent of the Commission (pursuant to 47 U.S.C. 310(d)) will be obtained?
Yes
No
Yes
No
Note: If the response to Question 7 is "Yes," the response to Questions 7(a), 7(b), and 7(c) must also be "Yes" in order to certify that the contractual documents "comply fully with the Commission's rules and policies."
If not, the applicant may not make the appropriate certification.
FCC 315 Worksheet 2 (Page 2) April 2001
WORKSHEET # 3 This worksheet may be used in connection with Section IV, Item 8 of FCC Form 315, the transferee's certification that the proposed station acquisition will comply with the Commission's multiple ownership rules.
For the convenience of the applicant, the various ownership restrictions have been broken down and separated.
A. MULTIPLE OWNERSHIP RULES This section of the worksheet may be used in connection with Section IV, Item 8a.1 of FCC Form 315, the transferee's certification of compliance with the Commission's numerical and cross-ownership limitations.
I. LOCAL RADIO STATION OWNERSHIP The local radio ownership rule, 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.3555(a)(1), limits the number of stations in which a party may hold attributable interests in any particular radio market.
In radio markets with 14 or fewer commercial radio stations, a party may hold an attributable ownership interest in up to 5 commercial radio stations, not more than 3 of which are in the same service (AM or FM).
However, a party may not hold an attributable ownership interest in more than 50 percent of the stations in markets of 14 or fewer stations.
In a radio market with between 15 and 29 (inclusive) commercial radio stations, a party may hold an attributable ownership interest in up to 6 commercial radio stations, no more than 4 of which are in the same service.
In a radio market with between 30 and 44 (inclusive) commercial radio stations, a party may hold an attributable ownership interest in up to 7 commercial radio stations, no more than 4 of which are in the same service.
In a radio market with 45 or more commercial radio stations, a party may hold an attributable ownership interest in up to 8 commercial radio stations, no more than 5 of which are in the same service.
A radio market is defined as that area encompassed by the principal community contours (predicted or measured 5 mV/m groundwave contour for AM; predicted 3.16 mV/m contour for FM) of the mutually overlapping stations proposing to have common ownership.
The number of stations in the market is based on the principal community contours of all operating, full-service commercial stations whose principal community contours overlap or intersect any of the principal community contours of the commonly-owned and mutually overlapping stations.
In calculating the number of stations in a market in which a party may have an attributable ownership interest, only commonly-owned stations that contribute to the mutual overlap in the relevant radio market count toward a transferee's Section 73.3555(a)(1) numerical limit.
That is, a station contour that overlaps the contour of a station outside the mutual overlap area, but does not have mutual overlap with all stations that create the market, does not count toward the local radio ownership "cap."
By way of illustration, in the simplified example below, Stations AM1, AM2, and FM2 have mutually overlapping contours; they therefore constitute a "market" for purposes of the local radio ownership rules.
The transferee/applicant should use the methodology specified above to determine the number of stations in that market.
However, Station FM1 does not overlap the mutually overlapping contours of Stations AM1, AM2, and FM2.
Therefore, the proposed acquisition of Station FM1 would not count as an additional station toward the local ownership cap for purposes of the Station AM1-AM2-FM2 overlap area.
Rather, Stations FM1 and FM2 would need to be analyzed as forming a separate radio "market."
FCC 315 Worksheet 3 June 2002
A transferee/applicant should review this worksheet if the principal community service contour (predicted or measured 5 mV/m groundwave contour for AM; predicted 3.16 mV/m contour for FM) of any AM or FM station being assigned overlaps with the principal community service contour of an AM or FM station in which the transferee or any party to this application has or proposes to have an attributable interest (including any AM or FM station with principal community contour overlap in which the applicant or any party to the application brokers or proposes to broker more than 15 percent of the broadcast time per week of such 1.
Is the overlap in every instance between only one AM and one FM station where neither of these two stations overlaps the principal community contour of a third station in the same service? If "Yes," the proposed transfer application complies with local radio station ownership rules.
If "No," answer the following questions with regard to each of the radio markets defined by the stations with mutually overlapping principal community contours: 2.
Number of commercial AM and FM stations in the market: 45 or more Between 30 and 44 Between 15 and 29 14 or fewer 3.
Number of FM stations in the market in which the transferee/applicant or parties to the application would have an attributable interest following transfer of the stations: Number of AM stations in the market in which the transferee/applicant or parties to the application would have an attributable interest following transfer of the stations: Total number of AM and FM stations in the market in which the transferee/applicant or parties to the application would have an attributable interest following transfer of the stations: Yes No
4.
5.
If transferee determines based on its review of these questions that it is in compliance with 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.3555(a), transferee may certify to such compliance in the attached application.
If transferee/applicant determines that it is not in compliance with the local radio ownership rules, it must mark "No" to Section III, Item 8a and submit an exhibit stating reasons in support of a waiver of the rules.
Note: An applicant responding "No" to Question 1 of this worksheet section must also submit a local radio ownership exhibit.
See instructions at Section IVF.
This exhibit should include (1) a map that clearly identifies, by relevant contours, the location and geographic coverage of the radio market or markets involved; (2) the number of commercial AM and FM stations counted as being in the market or markets, including a map that shows the principal community contours of the stations that define the market or markets and the principal community contours of all commercial stations intersecting with any of the principal community contours of these stations; and (3) the call letters and locations of all stations in the market or markets that are, or are proposed to be, commonly owned, operated, or controlled, including any AM or FM station in the market for which the applicant or any party to the application brokers more than 15 percent of that station's broadcast time per week.
However, in situations where the same service overlap only involves stations licensed to the same community, the applicant need not include a contour overlap map, provided the AM Expanded Band Station.
In Report and Order in MM Docket No. 87-267, 6 FCC Rcd 6273, 6320-21 (1991), the Commission modified the radio ownership rules to permit an existing AM licensee to own and operate another AM station in the AM "Expanded Band" (1605-1705 KHz) during the transition period to full implementation of the expanded band, even if this were to give the licensee a cognizable ownership interest in excess of the radio ownership limits.
However, during the period of allowable dual ownership, licensees are not permitted to assign either the existing-band or the expanded-band authorization independently of the other.
Accordingly, in order to evaluate the subject proposal's compliance with these policies, applicants should address the following questions.
FCC 315 Worksheet 3 (Page 2) June 2002
6.
a.
Does the transferee have either an application, a construction permit, or a license for a station in the expanded AM band (1605-1705 KHz)? If "Yes," do the agreements for the sale of the station(s) to be transferred maintain the common ownership of the expanded-band and related existing-band authorization as required by 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.1150(c).
Yes
No
b.
Yes
No
If the answer to Question 6b is "No," the proposed transfer may violate Section 73.1150(c).
The applicant therefore must mark "No" to Section IV, Item 8a.1, and submit an explanatory exhibit detailing how the proposed transaction complies with the rule or requesting and justifying a waiver.
II.
TELEVISION OWNERSHIP This section of the worksheet may be used in connection with Section IV, Item 8a.1 for the proposed acquisition of a full-service television station.
The television ownership rules place a numerical limit on the number of stations that can be owned by one entity in the local market and restrict the total national audience reach that can be attained by any one television station owner.
See 47 C.F.R.
Sections 73.3555(b); 73.3555(e).
1.
Local Ownership.
Will the acquisition of the commercial television station(s) being transferred result in the transferee or any party to this application having an attributable interest in another commercial television station which is located within the same Designated Market Area (DMA) as measured by Nielsen Media Research and whose Grade B contour overlaps the Grade B contour of the station(s) being transferred? If "Yes" to Question 1, at the time of filing of this application: a. are both of the commercial television stations ranked among the top four stations in the DMA, based on the most recent all-day (9:00 a.m.-midnight) audience share as determined by Nielsen or a comparable professional survey organization? b. are there fewer than 8 independently-owned, operating, full-power commercial and noncommercial television stations in the DMA? If "Yes" to Question 1 a or b, the applicant must mark "No" to Section IV, Item 8a and submit an exhibit stating the reasons in support of an exemption from, or waiver of, the Commission's television ownership regulations.
2.
National Audience Reach.
Will the acquisition of the commercial television station(s) being transferred result in the transferee or any party to this application having an attributable interest in commercial television stations which have an aggregate national audience reach exceeding 35 percent? Yes No Yes No Yes No
Yes
No
If "Yes" to Question 2, the applicant must mark "No" to Section IV, Item 8a and submit an exhibit stating the reasons in support of an exemption from, or waiver of, the Commission's television ownership regulations.
FCC 315 Worksheet 3 (Page 3) June 2002
III.
JOINT TELEVISION/RADIO OWNERSHIP This section of the worksheet may be used in connection with Section IV, Item 8a.1, when the transferee will have both full-service television and full-service radio interests in the same local market, as defined by 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.3555(c)(3).
1.
Will the acquisition of the station(s) being transferred result in the transferee or any party to this application having or maintaining an attributable interest in a commercial AM or FM station and a commercial television station where: a. the 1 mV/m contour of the commercial FM station or the 2 mV/m contour of the commercial AM station encompasses the entire community (communities) of license of the commercial television station? b. the Grade A contour of the commercial television station encompasses the entire community (communities) of license of the commercial AM or FM station? If "Yes" to Question 1 a or b, proceed to Question 2.
2.
Will the applicant or any party to this application directly or indirectly own, operate or control more than 2 commercial television and 1 commercial radio station, as a result of this transaction? If "Yes" to Question 2: a. where there are 20 or more independently-owned media voices in the television and radio markets, as defined by 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.3555(c)(3), at the time of the filing of this application, i. would the applicant or any party to this application directly or indirectly own, operate or control more than 2 commercial television and 6 commercial radio stations? ii. would the applicant or any party to this application directly or indirectly own, operate or control more than 1 commercial television and 7 commercial radio stations? iii. if the applicant or any party to this application would control as a result of this transaction 1 commercial television and 7 commercial radio stations, is the television station located in a market in which the applicant or any party to this application could not directly or indirectly own, operate or control 2 commercial television stations pursuant to 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.3555(b)? Yes No Yes No Yes No
Yes
No
Yes
No
Yes
No
b. where there are 10, but fewer than 20, independently-owned media voices in the television and radio markets, as defined by 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.3555(c)(3), at the time of the filing of this application, i. would the applicant or any party to this application directly or indirectly own, operate or control more than 2 commercial television and 4 commercial radio stations? If "Yes" to Question 2(a), (i), (ii), or (iii) or to Question 2(b)(i), the applicant must mark "No" to Section IV, Item 8a and submit an exhibit stating the reasons in support of an exemption from, or waiver of, the Commission's joint television and radio ownership regulations.
Yes No
FCC 315 Worksheet 3 (Page 4) June 2002
IV.
CROSS-OWNERSHIP This section of the worksheet may be used in connection with Section IV, Item 8a.1 of FCC Form 315 when the transferee will have other, non-broadcast, media interests in the same local market as the station(s) it seeks to acquire.
1.
Broadcast/Daily Newspaper ownership.
Will the acquisition of the station(s) being transferred/grant of this application result in the transferee or any party to this application having or maintaining an attributable interest in a daily English-language newspaper which is published in a community entirely encompassed by: a. b. c. 2.
the 1 mV/m contour of one of the FM station(s)? the 2 mV/m contour of one of the AM station(s)? the Grade A contour of one of commercial television station(s)? Yes Yes Yes Yes No No No No
Television/Cable System Ownership.
Will the acquisition of the commercial television station(s) being transferred/grant of this application result in the transferee or any party to this application directly or indirectly owning, operating, controlling, or having an attributable interest in a cable television system whose service area (i.e., the area within which the system is serving subscribers) is overlapped in whole or in part by the Grade B contour of the television station?
If "Yes" to any Question in either 1 or 2, the applicant must mark "No" to Section IV, Item 8a and submit an exhibit stating the reasons in support of a waiver of the Commission's broadcast/daily newspaper or television/cable system cross-ownership rules.
FCC 315 Worksheet 3 (Page 5) June 2002
B. FAMILY RELATIONSHIPS This section of the worksheet may be used in connection with Section IV, Item 8a.2 of FCC Form 315, which requires the transferee to certify that the proposed acquisition does not "present an issue" under the Commission's policies relating to media interests of immediate family members (i.e., husband, wife, father, mother, brother, sister, son or daughter).
The Commission does not prohibit, but rather considers relevant, media interests owned by immediate family members.
Accordingly, the transferee should examine the media interests of its principals' immediate family members to determine whether or not those media interests will be independent and not subject to common influence or control.
See Policy Statement, Clarification of Commission's Policies Regarding Spousal Attribution, 7 FCC Rcd 1920 (1992), Sevier Valley Broadcasting, Inc., 10 FCC Rcd 9795 (1995).
A transferee must review this worksheet if the answer to the following question is "Yes": Does any member of the immediate family (i.e., husband, wife, father, mother, brother, sister, son or daughter) of any party to the application have any interest in or connection with any other broadcast station, pending broadcast application or daily newspaper in the same area or, in the case of a television station applicant only, a cable television system in the same area? Yes No
A broadcast station and a daily newspaper are considered to be in the same area if: (1) the predicted or measured 2 mV/m contour of an AM station encompasses the entire community in which such daily newspaper is published; (2) the predicted 1 mV/m contour of an FM station encompasses the entire community in which such daily newspaper is published; or (3) the Grade A contour of a TV station encompasses the entire community in which such daily newspaper is published.
A daily newspaper is one that is published four or more days per week, is in the English language and is circulated generally in the community of publication.
A college newspaper is not considered as being circulated generally.
See 47 C.F.R.  73.3555(d) and 47 C.F.R.  73.3555 Note 6.
A television station and a cable television system are considered to be in the same area if the Grade B contour of the television station overlaps in whole or in part the service area of such system, i.e., the area within which the system is serving subscribers.
See 47 C.F.R.  76.501(a).
1.
Has the family member who is not included as a party to the application been involved in negotiations with the licensee/permittee for the acquisition/construction of any of the station(s) to be transferred? Has the family member who is not included as a party to the application provided financing or otherwise been involved in the process of making financial arrangements for the acquisition/construction of any of the station(s) to be transferred? Is this the first broadcast ownership interest of the family member who is a party to the Are the family members involved together in the management or operation of any other media interests located in other areas? Are there any agreements, arrangements or understandings, either written or oral, between the family members with same-area media interests for the participation of one family member in the financial affairs, commercial practices, programming, or employment practices of the other family member's media entity? Consider, for example, joint sales agreements, local marketing agreements, and arrangements to share facilities or personnel.
Yes
No
2.
Yes
No
3.
4.
Yes Yes
No No
5.
Yes
No
If transferee answers "No" to all of the above questions, transferee may conclude that it complies with the Commission's policies relating to media interests of immediate family members.
If transferee answers "Yes" to any one of the above questions, the transferee must mark "No" to Section IV, Item 8a and should submit an exhibit giving full particulars, including the family relationship involved and a detailed account of the business or media relationship between family members.
FCC 315 Worksheet 3 (Page 6) June 2002
C. FUTURE OWNERSHIP RIGHTS This section of the worksheet may be used in connection with Section IV, Item 8a.3, which requires the transferee to certify that the proposed acquisition complies with the Communications Act and the Commission's regulations and policies concerning future ownership rights in broadcast stations.
Section 310(d) of the Communications Act of 1934, as amended, prohibits assignment, transfer or any disposition of a broadcast license without first applying to the Commission and receiving approval.
Similarly, Commission precedent currently prohibits (1) pledge of a broadcast license as collateral for a loan, or (2) grant of a security interest (or any similar encumbrance) in a broadcast license.
These inquiries are directed to current and prospective third-party interests in the transferee.
In order to certify compliance with Item 8a.3 of Section IV of FCC Form 315, the transferee should review the following questions: 1.
Are there any documents, instruments, contracts, or understandings relating to future ownership rights in the transferee or any party to the application including, but not limited to: (1) stock pledges; (2) security agreements; (3) non-voting stock interests; (4) beneficial stock ownership interests; (5) options; (6) warrants; or (7) debentures? If "No," transferee may certify compliance with the future ownership inquiry.
If "Yes," proceed to the questions below.
2.
Is there any provision in the agreements which provides for a security interest in the station license(s), permits or authorizations? Note: The response to Question 2 must be "No" in order to certify that the contractual documents "comply fully with the Commission's rules and policies."
Under existing precedent, it is permissible to grant a security interest in the proceeds of the sale of a station license, permit, or authorization, but not in the license, permit, or authorization itself.
3.
Do the agreements contain a stock pledge? (a) If "Yes," do the agreements expressly state that voting rights will remain with the transferee, even in the event of default? Yes Yes No No Yes No Yes No
(b) If "Yes," do the agreements indicate that, in the event of default, there will be either a public (i.e., auction) or private arm's-length sale of the pledged interests? (c) If "Yes," do the agreements provide that, prior to the exercise of stockholder rights by the purchaser at such public or private sale, prior consent of the Commission (pursuant to 47 U.S.C.
Section 310(d)) will be obtained?
Yes
No
Yes
No
If the answer to (a), (b), or (c) is "No," the transferee must mark "No" to Section IV, Item 8a and submit an exhibit providing all details of the stock pledge agreement and demonstrating how the agreement is not violative of Section 73.1150 and Commission precedent.
FCC 315 Worksheet 3 (Page 7) June 2002
4.
If the agreements contain provisions relating to the acquisition of non-voting stock interests, beneficial stock interests, warrants, or debentures convertible into voting or non-voting stock, would the exercise of those interests, individually or in the aggregate, effectuate a positive or negative transfer of control of the transferee/applicant? If "Yes," the agreements must clearly indicate that, prior to the acquisition, exercise, or conversion of any future interest into equity that would effectuate a positive or negative transfer of control, prior Commission approval will be sought and received.
If they do not, the applicant must mark "No" to Section IV, Item 8a, and submit an exhibit providing all details and explaining how the agreements do not violate Commission policy or precedent.
Yes
No
FCC 315 Worksheet 3 (Page 8) June 2002
D. TIME BROKERAGE/LOCAL MARKETING AGREEMENTS This worksheet should be reviewed in connection with several different certifications.
These include Section III, Item 3 and Section IV, Item 5 (certifications by transferor and transferee relating to agreements for sale of station) and Section IV, Item 8a.
1.
Does or, as a result of this transaction, will the applicant or any party to this application, supply more than 15 percent of another, same-market station's weekly program hours? If "Yes," that interest is attributable to the transferee and must be considered in certifying compliance with the Commission's multiple ownership rules.
2.
Do any agreements entered into by the transferor and transferee contain a time brokerage agreement or local marketing agreement pursuant to which the transferee provides programming for the subject station(s) prior to Commission approval of the proposed transfer of control? If "Yes," proceed to Question 3.
3.
Has the transferor retained sufficient rights and obligations over the station's personnel, programming, and finances such that it retains control of the station under applicable Commission precedent, i.e., does the licensee/permittee: (a) retain the right to reject/substitute programming without excessive fee or penalty? Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes Yes No No No No No No No Yes No
Yes
No
(b) retain the right to terminate the agreement without excessive fee or penalty? (c) retain responsibility for broadcasting programming to meet local needs?
(d) retain the obligation to prepare and file the quarterly issues/programs list? (e) (f) retain the responsibility to comply with the Commission's political programming rules? retain the obligation to pay station expenses?
(g) retain the obligation to maintain the station's main studio and staff that studio with at least one management-level and one staff-level employee, Monday through Friday during regular business hours? If the response to any of these questions is "No," the agreement may not comport with existing Commission precedent.
The applicant should therefore mark "No" in the appropriate certification and supply an exhibit explaining how the agreement does not amount to a premature assumption of control by the transferee.
4.
Does the programming agreement extend beyond one full license term (i.e., eight years)? If "Yes," applicant complete complies the agreement may exceed the length allowable under Commission precedent.
The must therefore mark "No" to Section IV, Item 8a, and submit an exhibit containing the programming agreement (with all attachments) and discussing how its operation with precedent.
Yes
No
FCC 314 Worksheet 3 (Page 9) June 2002
E. INVESTOR INSULATION AND NON-PARTY INFLUENCE OVER TRANSFEREE This section of the worksheet may be used in connection with Section IV, Item 8a.4, which requires the transferee to certify that it complies with the Commission's restrictions relating to the insulation and non-participation of non-party investors and creditors.
See e.g., Report and Order in MM Docket Nos. 94-150, 92-51, and 87-154, FCC 99-207, released August 6, 1999.
It indicates the kinds of contractual relationships that may, in the Commission's view, exceed the authority of a properly insulated investor or demonstrate some indicia of de facto control by a creditor.
I. Investor Insulation If a transferee is a limited partnership or a limited liability company ("LLC") that seeks to insulate partners or members in accordance with the Commission's attribution rules, the transferee shall ensure that each such limited partner or LLC member is not materially involved, directly or indirectly, in the management or operation of the media-related activities of the partnership or LLC.
To ensure that each such limited partner or LLC member is not materially involved, directly or indirectly, in the management or operation of the media-related activities of the partnership or LLC, the applicant should answer the following inquiries.
Do the limited partnership or LLC enabling documents:
a.
specify that any exempt limited partner/LLC member (if not a natural person, its directors, officers, partners, etc.) cannot act as an employee of the limited partnership/LLC member if his or her functions, directly or indirectly, relate to the media enterprises of such entity? bar any exempt limited partner/LLC from serving, in any material capacity, as an independent contractor or agent with respect to the partnership/LLC's media enterprises? restrict any exempt limited partner/LLC member from communicating with the limited partnership/ LLC, the general partner, or any LLC management committee on matters pertaining to the day-to-day operations of its business? empower the general partner/LLC management committee to veto any admissions of additional general partners/LLC members admitted by vote of the exempt limited partners/LLC members? prohibit any exempt limited partner/LLC member from voting on the removal of a general partner/LLC member or limit this right to situations where the general partner/LLC member is (i) subject to bankruptcy proceedings, as described in Section 402(4)-(5) of the Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act, (ii) is adjudicated incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction, or (iii) is removed for cause, as determined by an independent party? bar any exempt limited partner/LLC member from performing any services to the limited partnership/LLC materially relating to its media activities, with the exception of making loans to, or acting as a surety for, the business? state, in express terms, that any exempt limited partner/LLC member is prohibited from becoming actively involved in the management or operation of the media businesses of the limited partnership/LLC?
Yes
No
b.
Yes
No
c.
Yes
No
d.
Yes
No
e.
Yes
No
f.
Yes
No
g.
Yes
No
If the answer is "Yes" to each of these conditions with regard to every limited partner and LLC member that the applicant seeks to insulate, and the relevant state statute authorizing the LLC permits a LLC member to insulate itself in accordance with the Commission's criteria, the applicant may certify that it complies with the Commission's restrictions regarding insulation of non-party investors.
If "No" to the foregoing, the applicant must submit an exhibit detailing the rights of any non-party and setting forth the applicant's reasons for not treating the investor as a party to the application.
FCC 315 Worksheet 3 (Page 10) June 2002
II.
Non-Party Influence Over Transferee/Applicant A. Non-party investors, i.e., investors with nonattributable interests, may have very limited powers over the operations of a licensee.
Accordingly, with respect to any agreement, arrangement or understanding involving insulated parties or other investors with nonattributable interests, including creditors, secured parties, program suppliers, and any other persons not disclosed as parties to this application, does such agreement: 1.
give any non-party investor the right to vote on any matters decided by the transferee's board of directors, partnership committee or other management group? give any non-party investor the right to attend, or appoint an observer to attend, transferee board, partnership or other management meetings? place any limitation on transferee programming discretion? give any non-party investor the right to vote on, approve or restrict transferee's actions on any matter relating to programming, personnel or finances? give any non-party creditor or any bond, debenture or warrant holder the right to vote on, approve or restrict the transferee's actions on any matter relating to programming, personnel or finances? give any non-party creditor or any bond, debenture or warrant holder the right to share in the profits of the transferee? give any non-party investor that holds a non-voting convertible interest the right to convert such an interest and acquire control of the transferee based on the transferee's actions relating to programming, personnel and finances? give any non-party investor, creditor, or bond, debenture or warrant holder the right to vote on, approve or deny the selection or removal of a general partner of a transferee/applicant partnership or a member of the transferee's governing body? give any non-party investor, creditor, or bond, debenture or warrant holder the right to convert, tender or require the tendering of stock pursuant to a put-or-call agreement based on the actions of the transferee/applicant relating to programming, personnel or financing? Yes No
2.
Yes
No
3.
4.
Yes Yes
No No
5.
Yes
No
6.
Yes
No
7.
Yes
No
8.
Yes
No
9.
Yes
No
If the answer to all of these conditions is "No" with regard to every non-party investor and creditor, and there are no other provisions that cede de facto control to a non-party, applicant may certify that it complies with the Commission's restrictions regarding non-participation of non-party investors and creditors.
If the answer to any of these inquiries is "Yes," the applicant must submit an exhibit detailing the rights of any non-party investor and setting forth fully the applicant's reasons for not treating the investor as a party to the application.
B. With respect to any loan agreement, has the transferee ensured that such agreement: 1.
includes an unconditional promise by the transferee to pay on demand or on a specific date a sum certain? contains a fixed or defined variable rate of interest on the loan? does not prohibit the redemption of the loan by the transferee, or permit redemption at the option of the lender only? Yes No
2.
3.
Yes Yes
No No
If the answer to each of these inquiries is "Yes," and if there are no other provisions that may give non-party investors control, the applicant may certify that it complies with the Commission's restrictions regarding non-participation of non-party investors and creditors.
If not, the applicant must submit an exhibit detailing the rights of the lender and the obligations of the transferee for each loan agreement.
FCC 315 Worksheet 3 (Page 11) June 2002
FederalCommunications Commission Washington, D. C. 20554
FCC 315
Approved by OMB 3060-0032
FOR FCC USE ONLY
APPLICATION FOR CONSENT TO TRANSFER CONTROL OF ENTITY HOLDING BROADCAST STATION CONSTRUCTION PERMIT OR LICENSE Section I - General Information 1.
Legal Name of the Licensee/Permittee
FOR COMMISSION USE ONLY FILE NO.
Mailing Address
City
State or Country (if foreign address)
ZIP Code
Telephone Number (include area code) FCC Registration Number Call Sign
E-Mail Address (if available) Facility ID Number
2.
Contact Representative (if other than licensee/permittee)
Firm or Company Name
Mailing Address
City
State or Country (if foreign address)
ZIP Code
Telephone Number (include area code)
E-Mail Address (if available)
3.
If this application has been submitted without a fee, indicate reason for fee exemption (see 47 C.F.R.
Section 1.1114): Governmental Entity Noncommercial Educational Licensee/Permittee Other ______________
4.
Purpose of Application: Transfer of control of licensee
Transfer of control of permittee
Amendment to pending application File Number of pending application: _____________________________ If an amendment, submit as an Exhibit a listing by Section and Question Number of the portions of the pending application that are being revised.
Exhibit No.
All previous editions obsolete.
F CC 315 June 2002
5.
Were any of the authorizations that are the subject of this application obtained through the Commission's competitive bidding procedures (see 47 C.F.R.
Sections 1.2111(a) and 73.5001)? If yes, list pertinent authorizations in an Exhibit.
Yes
No
Exhibit No.
6.
a Were any of the authorizations that are the subject of this application obtained through the Commission's point system for reserved channel noncommercial educational stations (see 47 C.F.R.
Sections 73.7001 and 73.7003)? b If yes to 6(a), have all such stations operated for at least 4 years with a minimum operating schedule since grant pursuant to the point system? If no, list pertinent authorizations in an Exhibit and include in the Exhibit a showing that the transaction is consistent with the holding period requirements of 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.7005(a).
Yes
No
Yes
No
Exhibit No.
F CC 315 (Page 2) June 2002
Section II - Transferor(s) 1.
Certification.
Transferor(s) certify that it (they) have answered each question in this application based on its (their) review of the application instructions and worksheets.
Transferor(s) further certify that where it (they) have made an affirmative certification below, this certification constitutes its (their) representation that the application satisfies each of the pertinent standards and criteria set forth in the application instructions and worksheets.
Legal Name of the Transferor Yes No
2.
Mailing Address
City
State or Country (if foreign address)
ZIP Code
FCC Registration Number
Telephone Number (include area code)
E-Mail Address (if available)
3.
Contact Representative (if other than transferor)
Firm or Company Name
Mailing Address
City
State or Country (if foreign address)
ZIP Code
Telephone Number (include area code)
E-Mail Address (if available) Exhibit No.
If more than one transferor, submit the information requested in questions 2 and 3 for each transferor.
4.
Changes in interests as a result of transfer.
INTEREST HELD (A) NAMES AND ADDRESSES OF ANY PARTY TO APPLICATION HOLDING AN ATTRIBUTABLE INTEREST (B) CITIZENSHIP (C) BEFORE TRANSFER OR ASSIGNMENT
(D) AFTER TRANSFER OR ASSIGNMENT
(1) Percentage Votes
(2) Percentage Total Assets (Equity plus Debt)
(1) Percentage Votes
(2) Percentage Total Assets (Equity plus Debt)
F CC 315 (Page 3) June 2002
I certify that the statements in this application are true, complete, and correct to the best of my knowledge and belief, and are made in good faith.
I acknowledge that all certifications and attached Exhibits are considered material representations.
Typed or Printed Name of Person Signing Typed or Printed Title of Person Signing
Signature
Date
WILLFUL FALSE STATEMENTS ON THIS FORM ARE PUNISHABLE BY FINE AND/OR IMPRISONMENT (U.S. CODE, TITLE 18, SECTION 1001), AND/OR REVOCATION OF ANY STATION LICENSE OR CONSTRUCTION PERMIT (U.S. CODE, TITLE 47, SECTION 312(a)(1)), AND/OR FORFEITURE (U.S. CODE, TITLE 47, SECTION 503).
F CC 315 (Page 4) June 2002
Section III - Licensee/Permittee 1.
Certification.
Licensee/permittee certifies that it has answered each question in this application based on its review of the application instructions and worksheets.
Licensee further certifies that where it has made an affirmative certification below, this certification constitutes its representation that the application satisfies each of the pertinent standards and criteria set forth in the application instructions and worksheets.
Authorizations to be Transferred.
List the authorized stations and construction permits to be transferred.
Provide the Facility Identification Number and the Call Sign, or the Facility Identification Number and the File Number of the Construction Permit, and the location, for each station to be transferred.
Include main stations, FM and/or TV translator stations, LPTV stations, SCA, FM and/or TV booster stations, and associated auxiliary service stations.
Call Sign or Construction Permit File Number City State Yes No
2.
Facility ID Number
3.
Agreements to Transfer Control of Station.
Licensee/permittee certifies that: a. it has placed in its public inspection file(s) and submitted to the Commission as an Exhibit to this application copies of all agreements to transfer control of the station(s); b. these documents embody the complete and final understanding between transferor(s)and transferee(s); and c. these agreements comply fully with the Commission's rules and policies.
Other Authorizations.
List call signs, locations, and facility identifiers of all other broadcast stations in which licensee/permittee or any party to the application has an attributable interest.
Character Issues.
Licensee/permittee certifies that neither licensee/permittee nor any party to the application has or has had any interest in, or connection with: a. any broadcast application in any proceeding where character issues were left unresolved or were resolved adversely against the applicant or any party to the application; or b. any pending broadcast application in which character issues have been raised.
Adverse Findings.
Licensee/permittee certifies that, with respect to the licensee/permittee and each party to the application, no adverse finding has been made, nor has an adverse final action been taken by any court or administrative body in a civil or criminal proceeding brought under the provisions of any law related to any of the following: any felony; mass media- related antitrust or unfair competition; fraudulent statements to another governmental unit; or discrimination.
Local Public Notice.
Licensee/permittee certifies that it has or will comply with the public notice requirements of 47 C.F.R.
Section 73.3580.
Yes Exhibit No.
No
See Explanation in Exhibit No.
4.
Exhibit No. N/A
5.
Yes
No
See Explanation in Exhibit No.
6.
Yes
No
See Explanation in Exhibit No.
7.
Yes
No
FCC 315 (Page 5) June 2002
8.
Auction Authorization.
Licensee/permittee certifies that more than five years have passed since the issuance of the construction permit for the station being transferred, where that permit was acquired in an auction through the use of a bidding credit or other special measure.
Anti-Drug Abuse Act Certification.
Licensee/permittee certifies that neither licensee/ permittee nor any party to the application is subject to denial of federal benefits pursuant to Section 5301 of the Anti-Drug Abuse Act of 1988, 21 U.S.C.
Section 862.
Yes N/A
No
See Explanation in Exhibit No.
9.
Yes
No
I certify that the statements in this application are true, complete, and correct to the best of my knowledge and belief, and are made in good faith.
I acknowledge that all certifications and attached Exhibits are considered material representations.
Typed or Printed Name of Person Signing Typed or Printed Title of Person Signing Signature Date
WILLFUL FALSE STATEMENTS ON THIS FORM ARE PUNISHABLE BY FINE AND/OR IMPRISONMENT (U.S. CODE, TITLE 18, SECTION 1001), AND/OR REVOCATION OF ANY STATION LICENSE OR CONSTRUCTION PERMIT (U.S. CODE, TITLE 47, SECTION 312(a)(1)), AND/OR FORFEITURE (U.S. CODE, TITLE 47, SECTION 503).
F CC 315 (Page 6) June 2002
Section IV - Transferee (s) 1.
Certification.
Transferee(s) certify that it (they) have answered each question in this application based on its (their) review of the application instructions and worksheets.
Transferee(s) further certify that where it (they) have made an affirmative certification below, this certification constitutes its (their) representation that the application satisfies each of the pertinent standards and criteria set forth in the application instructions and worksheets.
Legal Name of the Transferee(s) Yes No
2.
Mailing Address
City
State or Country (if foreign address)
ZIP Code
FCC Registration Number
Telephone Number (include area code)
E-Mail Address (if available)
3.
Contact Representative (if other than transferee)
Firm or Company Name
Mailing Address
City
State or Country (if foreign address)
ZIP Code
Telephone Number (include area code)
E-Mail Address (if available)
If more than one transferee, submit the information requested in questions 2 and 3 for each transferee.
4.
Nature of Applicant.
Each transferee is: an individual a limited partnership a general partnership a not-for-profit corporation
Exhibit No.
a for-profit corporation a limited liability company (LLC/LC) other
a.
If "other," describe nature of transferee in an Exhibit.
Exhibit No.
5.
Agreements to Transfer Control of Station.
Transferee certifies that: a. the written agreements in the licensee/permittee's public inspection file and submitted to the Commission embody the complete and final agreement to transfer control of the station(s) specified in Section III, question 2; and b. these agreements comply fully with the Commission's rules and policies.
Yes
No
See Explanation in Exhibit No.
FCC 315 (Page 7) June 2002
6.
Parties to the Application.
a List each transferee, and, if other than a natural person, its officers, directors, stockholders and other entities with attributable interests, non-insulated partners and/or members.
If a corporation or partnership holds an attributable interest in any transferee, list separately its officers, directors, stockholders and other entities with attributable interests, non-insulated partners and/or members.
Create a separate row for each individual or entity.
Attach additional pages if necessary.
(1) Name and address of the transferee and each party to the application holding an attributable interest (if other than individual also show name, address and citizenship of natural person authorized to vote the stock or holding the attributable interest).
List the transferee first, officers next, then directors and, thereafter, remaining stockholders and other entities with attributable interests, and partners.
(1) (2) (2) (3) Citizenship.
Positional Interest: Officer, director, general partner, limited partner, LLC member, investor/creditor attributable under the Commission's equity/debt plus standard, etc.
Percentage of votes.
Percentage of total assets (equity plus debt).
(4) (5)
(4) (3)
FCC 315 (Page 8) June 2002
b. Applicant certifies that equity and financial interests not set forth above are nonattributable.
7.
Other Authorizations.
List call signs, locations, and facility identifiers of all other broadcast stations in which transferee or any party to the application has an attributable interest.
Multiple Ownership.
a Transferee certifies that the proposed transfer: 1.
complies with the Commission's multiple and cross-ownership rules; 2.
does not present an issue under the Commission's policies relating to media interests of immediate family members; 3.
complies with the Commission's policies relating to future ownership interests; and 4.
complies with the Commission's restrictions relating to the insulation and nonparticipation of non-party investors and creditors.
Yes N/A Exhibit No.
No
See Explanation in Exhibit No.
N/A
8.
Yes
No
See Explanation in Exhibit No.
b.
Radio Applicants Only.
If the transfer of control of the station would result in certain principal community service contour overlaps, see Local Radio Ownership Worksheet, Question 1, applicant certifies that all relevant information has been placed in public inspection file(s) and submitted to the Commission.
Yes N/A
No
See Explanation in Exhibit No.
9.
Character Issues.
Transferee certifies that neither transferee nor any party to the application has or has had any interest in, or connection with: a. any broadcast application in any proceeding where character issues were left unresolved or were resolved adversely against the applicant or any party to the application; or b. any pending broadcast application in which character issues have been raised.
Yes
No
See Explanation in Exhibit No.
10.
Adverse Findings.
Transferee certifies that, with respect to the transferee and each party to the application, no adverse finding has been made, nor has an adverse final action been taken by any court or administrative body in a civil or criminal proceeding brought under the provisions of any law related to any of the following: any felony; mass media-related antitrust or unfair competition; fraudulent statements to another governmental unit; or discrimination? 11.
Alien Ownership and Control.
Transferee certifies that it complies with the provisions of Section 310 of the Communications Act of 1934, as amended, relating to interests of aliens and foreign governments.
12.
Financial Qualifications.
Transferee certifies that sufficient net liquid assets are on hand or are available from committed sources to consummate the transaction and operate the station(s) for three months.
13.
Program Service Certification.
Transferee certifies that it is cognizant of and will comply with its obligations as a Commission licensee to present a program service responsive to the issues of public concern facing the station's community of license and service area.
Yes
No
See Explanation in Exhibit No.
Yes
No
See Explanation in Exhibit No.
Yes
No
See Explanation in Exhibit No.
Yes
No
FCC 315 (Page 9) June 2002
14.
Auction Authorization.
Transferee certifies that where less than five years have passed since the issuance of the construction permit and the permit had been acquired in an auction through the use of a bidding credit or other special measure, it would qualify for such credit or other special measure.
15.
Anti-Drug Abuse Act Certification.
Transferee certifies that neither transferee nor any party to the application is subject to denial of federal benefits pursuant to Section 5301 of the Anti-Drug Abuse Act of 1988, 21 U.S.C.
Section 862.
16.
Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO).
If the applicant proposes to employ five or more full-time employees, applicant certifies that it is filing simultaneously with this application a Model EEO Program Report on FCC Form 396-A.
Yes N/A
No
See Explanation in Exhibit No.
Yes
No
Yes
No
N/A
I certify that the statements in this application are true, complete, and correct to the best of my knowledge and belief, and are made in good faith.
I acknowledge that all certifications and attached Exhibits are considered material representations.
I hereby waive any claim to the use of any particular frequency as against the regulatory power of the United States because of the previous use of the same, whether by license or otherwise, and request an authorization in accordance with this application.
(See Section 304 of the Communications Act of 1934, as amended.)
Typed or Printed Name of Person Signing Typed or Printed Title of Person Signing
Signature
Date
WILLFUL FALSE STATEMENTS ON THIS FORM ARE PUNISHABLE BY FINE AND/OR IMPRISONMENT (U.S. CODE, TITLE 18, SECTION 1001), AND/OR REVOCATION OF ANY STATION LICENSE OR CONSTRUCTION PERMIT (U.S. CODE, TITLE 47, SECTION 312(a)(1)), AND/OR FORFEITURE (U.S. CODE, TITLE 47, SECTION 503).
FCC 315 (Page 10) June 2002
